Utah statutes.
58-17b-602.5.   Information on prescription labels -- Education outreach.

The division, in order to assist emergency responders in quickly determining the physical condition of a patient at the scene of an emergency, as well as for the benefit of physicians and consumers, shall:

(1)  provide information on the pharmacy licensing website recommending that prescribers, pharmacists, and pharmacy interns include information on the label of a drug dispensed under Section 58-17b-602 describing the condition the prescription is meant to treat; and

(2)  as part of the website information, specify that information described in Subsection (1) should not be included on the label if the prescriber or patient indicates that the information may not be included on the label.



Enacted by Chapter 79, 2013 General Session

